Utah statutes.
20A-3-103.   Employee's right to time off for election.
(1) (a)  Each employer shall allow any voter to be absent from service or
employment on election day for not more than two hours between the time the
polls open and close.
(b)  The voter shall apply for a leave of absence before election day.
(c) (i)  The employer may specify the hours during which the employee may be
absent.
(ii)  If the employee requests the leave of absence at the beginning or end of
the work shift, the employer shall grant that request.
(d)  The employer may not deduct from an employee's usual salary or wages
because of the absence.
(2)  This section does not apply to an employee who has three or more hours
between the time polls open and close during which the employee is not
employed on the job.
(3)  Any employer who violates this section is guilty of a class B
misdemeanor.
